Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-509
Prohibited acts; penalty.

If any person or officer, contrary to the provisions of sections 10-501 to 10-509, shall knowingly issue or deliver, or put in circulation, use, or in any manner dispose of, contrary to law, any warrant, order, certificate or audited account, intended to be redeemed or paid under the provisions of said sections, either before or after the same has been paid or canceled, and thereby defraud, or attempt to defraud, any corporation, county, state or person, he shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1879, § 140, p. 389;

R.S.1913, § 424;

C.S.1922, § 341;

C.S.1929, § 11-509;

R.S.1943, § 10-509;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 69.